dictionaries/ka_GE.aff
FLAG long
PFX 8W Y 1
PFX 8W 0       წაგვი/&x   .

PFX 9W Y 1
PFX 9W 0       წაუ/&x     .
  
PFX 0w Y 1
PFX 0w 0       წამო/&x     .

PFX 1w Y 1
PFX 1w 0       წამოვ/&x     .

PFX 2w Y 1
PFX 2w 0       წამომ/&x     .

PFX 3w Y 1
PFX 3w 0       წამოგ/&x     .

PFX 4w Y 3
PFX 4w 0       წამოს/&x        [დტთძწცჯჭჩ]
PFX 4w 0       წამოჰ/&x        [გკქგყ]
PFX 4w 0       წამო/&x [^დტთძწცჯჭჩგკქგყ]

PFX 5w Y 1
PFX 5w 0       წამოგვ/&x    .

PFX 6w Y 1
PFX 6w 0       წამომი/&x    .

PFX 7w Y 1
PFX 7w 0       წამოგი/&x    .

PFX 8w Y 1
PFX 8w 0       წამოგვი/&x   .

PFX 9w Y 1
PFX 9w 0       წამოუ/&x     .
  
PFX 0n Y 1
PFX 0n 0       და/&x     .

PFX 1n Y 1
PFX 1n 0       დავ/&x     .

PFX 2n Y 1
PFX 2n 0       დამ/&x     .

PFX 3n Y 1
PFX 3n 0       დაგ/&x     .

PFX 4n Y 3
PFX 4n 0       დას/&x        [დტთძწცჯჭჩ]
PFX 4n 0       დაჰ/&x        [გკქგყ]
PFX 4n 0       და/&x [^დტთძწცჯჭჩგკქგყ]

PFX 5n Y 1
PFX 5n 0       დაგვ/&x    .

PFX 6n Y 1
PFX 6n 0       დამი/&x    .

PFX 7n Y 1
PFX 7n 0       დაგი/&x    .

PFX 8n Y 1
PFX 8n 0       დაგვი/&x   .

PFX 9n Y 1
PFX 9n 0       დაუ/&x     .
  
PFX 0N Y 1
PFX 0N 0       0/&x     .

PFX 1N Y 1
PFX 1N 0       ვ/&x     .

PFX 2N Y 1
PFX 2N 0       მ/&x     .

PFX 3N Y 1
PFX 3N 0       გ/&x     .

PFX 4N Y 3
PFX 4N 0       ს/&x        [დტთძწცჯჭჩ]
PFX 4N 0       ჰ/&x        [გკქგყ]
PFX 4N 0       0/&x [^დტთძწცჯჭჩგკქგყ]

PFX 5N Y 1
PFX 5N 0       გვ/&x    .

PFX 6N Y 1
PFX 6N 0       მი/&x    .

PFX 7N Y 1
PFX 7N 0       გი/&x    .

PFX 8N Y 1
PFX 8N 0       გვი/&x   .

PFX 9N Y 1
PFX 9N 0       უ/&x     .
  


############################
# Present and Future Tense #
############################



SFX PI Y 7
SFX PI 0       0/&x1I         .
SFX PI 0       0/&x0I         .
SFX PI 0       ს/&x0I         .
SFX PI 0       თ/&x1I         .
SFX PI 0       თ/&x0I         .
SFX PI 0       ენ/&x0I        [^ი]
SFX PI 0       ან/&x0I        ი
  
SFX Po Y 7
SFX Po 0       0/&x1o         .
SFX Po 0       0/&x0o         .
SFX Po 0       ს/&x0o         .
SFX Po 0       თ/&x1o         .
SFX Po 0       თ/&x0o         .
SFX Po 0       ენ/&x0o        [^ი]
SFX Po 0       ან/&x0o        ი
  
SFX PA Y 7
SFX PA 0       0/&x1A         .
SFX PA 0       0/&x0A         .
SFX PA 0       ს/&x0A         .
SFX PA 0       თ/&x1A         .
SFX PA 0       თ/&x0A         .
SFX PA 0       ენ/&x0A        [^ი]
SFX PA 0       ან/&x0A        ი
  
SFX PC Y 7
SFX PC 0       0/&x1C         .
SFX PC 0       0/&x0C         .
SFX PC 0       ს/&x0C         .
SFX PC 0       თ/&x1C         .
SFX PC 0       თ/&x0C         .
SFX PC 0       ენ/&x0C        [^ი]
SFX PC 0       ან/&x0C        ი
  
SFX Pa Y 7
SFX Pa 0       0/&x1a         .
SFX Pa 0       0/&x0a         .
SFX Pa 0       ს/&x0a         .
SFX Pa 0       თ/&x1a         .
SFX Pa 0       თ/&x0a         .
SFX Pa 0       ენ/&x0a        [^ი]
SFX Pa 0       ან/&x0a        ი
  
SFX Pc Y 7
SFX Pc 0       0/&x1c         .
SFX Pc 0       0/&x0c         .
SFX Pc 0       ს/&x0c         .
SFX Pc 0       თ/&x1c         .
SFX Pc 0       თ/&x0c         .
SFX Pc 0       ენ/&x0c        [^ი]
SFX Pc 0       ან/&x0c        ი
  
SFX PE Y 7
SFX PE 0       0/&x1E         .
SFX PE 0       0/&x0E         .
SFX PE 0       ს/&x0E         .
SFX PE 0       თ/&x1E         .
SFX PE 0       თ/&x0E         .
SFX PE 0       ენ/&x0E        [^ი]
SFX PE 0       ან/&x0E        ი
  
SFX PG Y 7
SFX PG 0       0/&x1G         .
SFX PG 0       0/&x0G         .
SFX PG 0       ს/&x0G         .
SFX PG 0       თ/&x1G         .
SFX PG 0       თ/&x0G         .
SFX PG 0       ენ/&x0G        [^ი]
SFX PG 0       ან/&x0G        ი
  
SFX Pe Y 7
SFX Pe 0       0/&x1e         .
SFX Pe 0       0/&x0e         .
SFX Pe 0       ს/&x0e         .
SFX Pe 0       თ/&x1e         .
SFX Pe 0       თ/&x0e         .
SFX Pe 0       ენ/&x0e        [^ი]
SFX Pe 0       ან/&x0e        ი
  
SFX Pg Y 7
SFX Pg 0       0/&x1g         .
SFX Pg 0       0/&x0g         .
SFX Pg 0       ს/&x0g         .
SFX Pg 0       თ/&x1g         .
SFX Pg 0       თ/&x0g         .
SFX Pg 0       ენ/&x0g        [^ი]
SFX Pg 0       ან/&x0g        ი
  
SFX PX Y 7
SFX PX 0       0/&x1X         .
SFX PX 0       0/&x0X         .
SFX PX 0       ს/&x0X         .
SFX PX 0       თ/&x1X         .
SFX PX 0       თ/&x0X         .
SFX PX 0       ენ/&x0X        [^ი]
SFX PX 0       ან/&x0X        ი
  
SFX Px Y 7
SFX Px 0       0/&x1x         .
SFX Px 0       0/&x0x         .
SFX Px 0       ს/&x0x         .
SFX Px 0       თ/&x1x         .
SFX Px 0       თ/&x0x         .
SFX Px 0       ენ/&x0x        [^ი]
SFX Px 0       ან/&x0x        ი
  
SFX PW Y 7
SFX PW 0       0/&x1W         .
SFX PW 0       0/&x0W         .
SFX PW 0       ს/&x0W         .
SFX PW 0       თ/&x1W         .
SFX PW 0       თ/&x0W         .
SFX PW 0       ენ/&x0W        [^ი]
SFX PW 0       ან/&x0W        ი
  
SFX Pw Y 7
SFX Pw 0       0/&x1w         .
SFX Pw 0       0/&x0w         .
SFX Pw 0       ს/&x0w         .
SFX Pw 0       თ/&x1w         .
SFX Pw 0       თ/&x0w         .
SFX Pw 0       ენ/&x0w        [^ი]
SFX Pw 0       ან/&x0w        ი
  
SFX Pn Y 7
SFX Pn 0       0/&x1n         .
SFX Pn 0       0/&x0n         .
SFX Pn 0       ს/&x0n         .
SFX Pn 0       თ/&x1n         .
SFX Pn 0       თ/&x0n         .
SFX Pn 0       ენ/&x0n        [^ი]
SFX Pn 0       ან/&x0n        ი
  
SFX PN Y 7
SFX PN 0       0/&x1N         .
SFX PN 0       0/&x0N         .
SFX PN 0       ს/&x0N         .
SFX PN 0       თ/&x1N         .
SFX PN 0       თ/&x0N         .
SFX PN 0       ენ/&x0N        [^ი]
SFX PN 0       ან/&x0N        ი
  



SFX QI Y 6
SFX QI 0       ი/&x1I         .
SFX QI 0       ი/&x0I         .
SFX QI 0       ა/&x0I         .
SFX QI 0       ით/&x1I        .
SFX QI 0       ით/&x0I        .
SFX QI 0       იან/&x0I       .
  
SFX Qo Y 6
SFX Qo 0       ი/&x1o         .
SFX Qo 0       ი/&x0o         .
SFX Qo 0       ა/&x0o         .
SFX Qo 0       ით/&x1o        .
SFX Qo 0       ით/&x0o        .
SFX Qo 0       იან/&x0o       .
  
SFX QA Y 6
SFX QA 0       ი/&x1A         .
SFX QA 0       ი/&x0A         .
SFX QA 0       ა/&x0A         .
SFX QA 0       ით/&x1A        .
SFX QA 0       ით/&x0A        .
SFX QA 0       იან/&x0A       .
  
SFX QC Y 6
SFX QC 0       ი/&x1C         .
SFX QC 0       ი/&x0C         .
SFX QC 0       ა/&x0C         .
SFX QC 0       ით/&x1C        .
SFX QC 0       ით/&x0C        .
SFX QC 0       იან/&x0C       .
  
SFX Qa Y 6
SFX Qa 0       ი/&x1a         .
SFX Qa 0       ი/&x0a         .
SFX Qa 0       ა/&x0a         .
SFX Qa 0       ით/&x1a        .
SFX Qa 0       ით/&x0a        .
SFX Qa 0       იან/&x0a       .
  
SFX Qc Y 6
SFX Qc 0       ი/&x1c         .
SFX Qc 0       ი/&x0c         .
SFX Qc 0       ა/&x0c         .
SFX Qc 0       ით/&x1c        .
SFX Qc 0       ით/&x0c        .
SFX Qc 0       იან/&x0c       .
  
SFX QE Y 6
SFX QE 0       ი/&x1E         .
SFX QE 0       ი/&x0E         .
SFX QE 0       ა/&x0E         .
SFX QE 0       ით/&x1E        .
SFX QE 0       ით/&x0E        .
SFX QE 0       იან/&x0E       .
  
SFX QG Y 6
SFX QG 0       ი/&x1G         .
SFX QG 0       ი/&x0G         .
SFX QG 0       ა/&x0G         .
SFX QG 0       ით/&x1G        .
SFX QG 0       ით/&x0G        .
SFX QG 0       იან/&x0G       .
  
SFX Qe Y 6
SFX Qe 0       ი/&x1e         .
SFX Qe 0       ი/&x0e         .
SFX Qe 0       ა/&x0e         .
SFX Qe 0       ით/&x1e        .
SFX Qe 0       ით/&x0e        .
SFX Qe 0       იან/&x0e       .
  
SFX Qg Y 6
SFX Qg 0       ი/&x1g         .
SFX Qg 0       ი/&x0g         .
SFX Qg 0       ა/&x0g         .
SFX Qg 0       ით/&x1g        .
SFX Qg 0       ით/&x0g        .
SFX Qg 0       იან/&x0g       .
  
SFX QX Y 6
SFX QX 0       ი/&x1X         .
SFX QX 0       ი/&x0X         .
SFX QX 0       ა/&x0X         .
SFX QX 0       ით/&x1X        .
SFX QX 0       ით/&x0X        .
SFX QX 0       იან/&x0X       .
  
SFX Qx Y 6
SFX Qx 0       ი/&x1x         .
SFX Qx 0       ი/&x0x         .
SFX Qx 0       ა/&x0x         .
SFX Qx 0       ით/&x1x        .
SFX Qx 0       ით/&x0x        .
SFX Qx 0       იან/&x0x       .
  
