dictionaries/ka_GE.dic
აბამ/PEPN
აბარებ/PCPN
აბრუნებ/PePN
აგდებ/PCPXPN
აგვარებ/Po&v
აგნებ/PI&v
აგრძელებ/PGPN
ადარებ/PEPN
ადასტურებ/PnPN
ადგებ/QIQn&v
ადგენ/PEPnPN
ადებ/Pn&v
ადიდებ/INPGPN
ავალებ/PN
ავნებ/PN
ავსებ/PAPEPN
ათავისუფლებ/PGPN
ათავსებ/PoPN
ათამაშებ/PN
აკავშირებ/PnPN
აკარებ/Pn&v
აკეთებ/INPGPN
აკითხავ/Po&v
აკლებ/PnPN
აკუთვნებ/PI&v
ალევინებ/Pn&v
ამატებ/InPN
ამოწმებ/PEPN
ამტკიცებ/PnPN
ამჩნევ/PEPN
ამჯობინებ/PN
ანაცვლებ/PC&v
ანგრევ/PnPN
ანებებ/INPnPN
ანთებ/PA&v
ანიშნებ/PI&v
აპყრობ/PI&v
არბენინებ/Po&v
ართმევ/PIPWPN
არიგებ/PN
არკვევ/PGPN
არღვევ/PnPN
არჩევ/INPEPgPN
არჩენ/PoPX&v
ასვენებ/PnPN
ასკვნი/Pn&v
ასმევ/PN
ასრულებ/IEINPAPEPN
ასწორებ/PG&v
ასწრებ/INPoPN
ასხი/Pn&v
ატარებ/INPGPN
ატყობინებ/PEPN
აფასებ/INPEPN
აქებ/INPN
აქცევ/INPIPoPEPN
აღწევ/IIPIPEPN
აყალიბებ/PcPN
აყენებ/PIPCPnPN
აყრი/PnPN
აშენებ/PA
აშურებ/PI&v
აჩერებ/PEPGPN
აცნობ/PNONANaNkN
აძლიერებ/PN
აწევ/Po
აწერ/IIPIOIOoOWAIaIkIAoaoko
აწვდი/PI&v
აწვებ/QI&v
აწყობ/PGPN
ახდენ/PoPN
ახერხებ/IoPoPN
ახსენებ/INPoPN
ბაძავ/PN
ბედავ/INPGPN
ბრუნდებ/QoQgQn&v
გზავნი/IGPgPN
გიჟდებ/QG&v
დგ/QETnTNoAoCoEogonAGaGlG&v
დგამ/PnPN
დგებ/QE&v
დგები/PAPgPwPN
დგებოდი/PA&v
დგი/Pn&v
ეახლებ/QI&v
ეახლები/PN
ედევნები/Pn&v
ედინებ/QI&v
ეკიდებ/Qo&v
ელი/NSNNPoOETN
ემართებ/QI&v
ემგზავრებ/QI&v
ემორჩილები/Pn&v
ერევი/PoPN
ესალმებ/QIQN&v
ეტყუები/PE&v
ეუბნები/PN
ექანებ/QI&v
ექცევი/PE
ეშურებ/JNQI&v
ეჩვევ/QIQN&v
ეცდებ/QE&v
ეცლებ/QG&v
ეცნობ/QGQN&v
ეძებ/INPnPNON
ეწამები/PN
ზომავ/PGPN
ზღუდავ/PN
თავისუფლდებ/QGQN&v
თანხმდებ/QE&v
თმობ/Pn&v
თქვამ/Pg&v
თხრ/Qa&v
იაზრებ/PG&v
იგებ/IGPoPGPN
იგვიანებ/PnPN
იგონებ/INPoPN
იგრძნობ/PEPN
იდებ/Pn
ივიწყებ/PnPN
ივლი/INPoPGPXPN
ივსებ/QA&v
იზიარებ/PN
ითვალისწინებ/PGPN
ითვისებ/PEPN
ითმენ/IoPoPN
ითხოვ/IoINPoPNOoONAoaokoANaNkN
იკავებ/PEPnPN
იკიდებ/Po&v
იკითხავ/PoPaPWPN
იკლებ/PA
იკრებ/PE&v
იმეორებ/PN
იმეტებ/PG&v
იმეცნებ/PE&v
იმორჩილებ/Pn&v
იმოქმედებ/PoPN
იმუშავებ/PEPgPN
ინანებ/PnPN
ინახავ/InINPEPnPN
ინდომებ/Po&v
იპარებ/QI&v
იპოვებ/Po&v
ირაცხები/PE&v
ირთმევ/PI&v
ირჩევ/IAINPAPN
ისახავ/PN
ისეირნებ/PG&v
ისვენებ/PnPN
ისვრი/PGPN
ისმენ/INPoPN
ისურვებ/Po
ისყიდ/Qo&v
ისწავლი/PEPN
ისწრაფი/PIPN
იტან/IIPIPoPcPEPGPePgPXPNOIOoOAOEOGOgOXAIaIkIAoaokoACaCkCAaaakaAcackcAEaEkEAGaGkGAeaekeAgagkg
იტაცებ/Po
იტყობ/IEPE&v
იქმ/JNPEPN
იქცევი/PoPGPN
იღებ/IIIAPIPAPaPWPN
იღი/Po&v
იყენებ/IgPgPN
იყვან/PIPoPAPGPgPXPWOIOoOAOCOEOGOeOgOXOWOnAIaIkIAoaokoAAaAkAACaCkCAabakaAcackcAEaEkEAGaGkGAgagkgAXaXkXAWaWkWAwawkw&v
იყვარებ/PE&v
იყვირებ/PN
იყრებ/QE&v
იყურებ/JgJNQg&v
იჩენ/PgPN
იჩნევ/IIPI&v
იცავ/INPnPN
იცვამ/PCPN
იცვლები/PN
იცვლი/PE&v
იცნობ/INPGPN
იძახი/PGPN
იძენ/PE
იძინებ/Pn
იწევ/PIPoPN
იწერ/PNOCOXOnACaCkC
იწვევ/PgPN
იწყებ/INPnPN
იჭერ/PnPN
იხარებ/INPG
იხდი/PoPN
იხვეჭ/PN
იხრებ/QXQN&v
იხრი/PoPN
იხსენებ/PGPN
იხსენიებ/Po&v
იჯერებ/PnPN
კალათდებ/Qo&v
კარგავ/InPnPN
კვდები/PoPN
კვეთ/PXOg&v
კვირდ/QG&v
კლავ/IoINPoPnPN
ლახავ/PX&v
ლოცულობ/PN
მალავ/PnPN
მართავ/PIPGPN
მდინარეობ/PI&v
მზერ/Pn&v
მსახურობ/INPN
ნატრი/PE
ნახავ/INPgPN
ნიშნავ/Pn&v
რგავ/PN
რთავ/PC&v
რისკავ/PG&v
რიცხავ/Pg&v
რჩები/PoPXPn
სახავ/PAPgPN
სახლდებ/QX&v
სდებ/Pn&v
სდევ/PIPnPN
სდი/PCOIANbNkN&v
სეირნობ/INPn&v
სვამ/PCPnPN
სთხოვ/PEPNONANaNkN
სპობ/PoPN
სტირი/NSNNPnTN
სულდგმულობ/PN
სცემ/IIIGINPIPGPN
სცქერი/PE&v
სძენ/Pn&v
სწერ/INPnPN
სწირავ/PE
სწყდებ/Qo&v
ტირდები/PA&v
უამბობ/PN
უგდებ/PI
უდგებ/JEQE&v
უვარდებ/QEQn&v
უვლი/PoPAPCPN
უთვალთვალებ/PN
უთითებ/PI&v
უკეთებ/PGPN
უკრავ/InINPnPN
უმხელ/PG&v
უპირებ/INPN
ურბი/PG
ურევ/PAPN
უსმენ/INPoPN
უსურვებ/PN
უსჯი/PI&v
უტან/PIOIAIaIkIAoaoko&v
უღებ/Po&v
უყენებ/PWPN
უშვებ/IGPAPCPGPgPnPN
უშლი/PEPN
უჩვენებ/PN
უცდი/INPnPN
უძახებ/Pn&v
უძღვნი/PIPN
უწოდებ/PoPN
უწყებ/Pn&v
უჭერ/PN
უხმობ/PoPN
ფლობ/PN
ფრინავ/PIPn
ფრინდები/PG&v
ქრებ/QGQN&v
ქრი/PIPn&v
ღმართავ/PA&v
ღნიშნავ/PA&v
ღრიალებ/PN
ყვებ/JIQIQoQAQN&v
ყოფ/PgPnPN
შორდებ/QoQN&v
ჩერდებ/QEQGQN&v
ჩნდები/Pg&v
ჩუმდებ/QG&v
ჩურჩულებ/PN
ცვივდებ/QI&v
ცრუობ/PN
ცურავ/PIPnPN
ცქერ/QE&v
ძებნ/QgOoOgAoaokoANaNkN&v
ძვრებ/QI&v
ძლებ/IEPE
წერ/INPAPnPNOCOcOnONACaCkCAXaXkX
წვდი/PA&v
წურავ/Pg&v
წყვეტ/PXPN
ჭამ/INPEPNOEONoEANaNkN
ჭრი/Pc
ხატავ/INPgPN
ხდები/PG
ხედავ/IEINPIPEPXPN
ხვდებ/JIJEJNQoQEQnQN&v
ხვდები/PI
ხლეჩ/PN
ხოცავ/INPnPN
ხსნი/Po
ჰკივი/PN
ჰკლავ/Po
ჰყვებ/Qo&v
ჰხვდები/PI&v
